Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-741
Contracts; bidding requirements.

All contracts for construction work to be done or materials or equipment purchased, the expense of which is more than fifty thousand dollars, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, upon notice of not less than twenty days, of the terms and conditions of the contract to be let. The board of trustees or the administrator shall have power to reject any and all bids and readvertise for the letting of such work or to negotiate any contract after an unsuccessful public letting.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 15, p. 201;

Laws 1978, LB 634, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 910, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 176, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1175, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 86.
July 18, 2026